Vermont statutes. Title 25 Navigation and Waters
Subchapter 2. Assessment of Damages Caused by Floating Lumber

§ 241.
Application of provisions.

This subchapter shall apply to every person, partnership, unincorporated association, or corporation that shall drive or float lumber in any stream.
The use of any such stream for such purpose shall constitute an election on the part of such person, partnership, unincorporated association, or corporation to be subject to the provisions of this subchapter and to be bound thereby.
This subchapter shall apply to every owner of the land adjoining any stream so used for the purpose of driving or floating lumber, unless, within 60 days after an alleged injury, the owner notifies, in writing, the Public Utility Commission that the provisions of this subchapter are not intended to apply.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 242.
Petition to Public Utility Commission.

When damage is done to such owner by such lumber in the driving or floating of the same and such owner and the owner of the lumber do not agree upon the damages, either party may prefer a petition to the Public Utility Commission setting forth the injury alleged to be sustained and praying for the redress provided for by this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 243.
Notice and hearing; decision.

Upon due notice to all parties in interest, the Public Utility Commission shall hear and determine the cause of such injury to the land or other property adjoining such stream.
When the Commission determines that such injury was caused by the driving or floating of lumber, it shall fix the compensation to be paid therefor, including expense for witnesses and a reasonable attorney fee, and render decision accordingly, which decision shall be final and a bar to any other action brought for such damages.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 244.
Judgment on decision.

A party in interest may file in the Superior Court for the county in which the inquiry was held a certified copy of the decision of the Commission awarding compensation, whereupon such court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties thereof.
Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same as though such judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court, and there shall be no appeal therefrom.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 245.
Bond of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation, before driving or floating any logs, lumber, or other timber in any stream in this State, shall file in the Office of the Secretary of State for the benefit of the owners of land adjoining any stream used by such corporation, a good and sufficient bond to be approved by the Secretary and in such sum as he or she directs.
Such bond shall be given to the Secretary as trustee of the corporation, for each and all of the riparian owners, and shall be conditioned for the payment of all damages and compensation awarded by the Commission and any judgment rendered by any court from which an appeal has not been taken.
Upon breach of the condition of such bond, the Secretary, upon application by a riparian owner whose award by the Commission or judgment remains unpaid for more than 30 days, shall institute proceedings thereon in his or her name as trustee for the benefit of all landowners to whom such corporation may be indebted, as hereinbefore provided, at the time such proceedings shall be instituted.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 246.
Penalties for noncompliance.

A corporation that neglects or refuses to comply with a provision of section 245 of this title shall be fined not more than $100.00 nor less than $10.00, with costs, for each day’s neglect or refusal.